Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.802

Rules—Definition of "alcohol-affected infant."

By July 1, 1999, the department of social and health services, in consultation with the department of health, shall adopt rules to implement chapter 314, Laws of 1998, including a definition of "alcohol-affected infant," which shall be limited to infants who are affected by a mother's abuse of alcohol.

[ 1998 c 314 s 29.]